Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-10-205.2 of Title 27A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Department of Environmental Quality to be designated the
"Biosolids Land Application Research Revolving Fund". The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of all monies received by the Department of
Environmental Quality as provided by law. All monies accruing to
the credit of said fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted
Req. No. 16400 Page 1

and expended by the Department of Environmental Quality for the
purpose of obtaining equipment, staffing, and training for the
testing of biosolids. Expenditures from said fund shall be made
upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-16400 JL 02/16/26











Req. No. 16400 Page 2